Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2508
Ancillary and other local administrations; provisions governing.

In respect to a nonresident decedent, the provisions of Article 24 of this code govern (1) proceedings, if any, in a court of this state for probate of the will, appointment, removal, supervision, and discharge of the local personal representative, and any other order concerning the estate; and (2) the status, powers, duties and liabilities of any local personal representative and the rights of claimants, purchasers, distributees and others in regard to a local administration.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 214, UPC § 4-207.